Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB610.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. KRS 132.010 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED TO READ
AS FOLLOWS:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Agricultural land" means:
(a) Any tract of land, including all income-producing improvements, of at least
ten (10) contiguous acres in area used for the production of livestock,
livestock products, poultry, poultry products and/or the growing of tobacco
and/or other crops including timber;
(b) Any tract of land, including all income-producing improvements, of at least
five (5) contiguous acres in area commercially used for aquaculture; or
(c) Any tract of land devoted to and meeting the requirements and
qualifications for payments pursuant to agriculture programs under an
agreement with the state or federal government;
(2) "Agricultural or horticultural value" means the use value of agricultural or
horticultural land based upon income-producing capability and comparable sales
of farmland purchased for farm purposes where the price is indicative of farm
use value, excluding sales representing purchases for farm expansion, better
accessibility, and other factors which inflate the purchase price beyond farm use
value, if any, considering the following factors as they affect a taxable unit:
(a) Relative percentages of tillable land, pasture land, and woodland;
(b) Degree of productivity of the soil;
(c) Risk of flooding;
(d) Improvements to and on the land that relate to the production of income;
(e) Row crop capability including allotted crops other than tobacco;
(f) Accessibility to all-weather roads and markets; and
Page 1 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
(g) Factors which affect the general agricultural or horticultural economy,
such as interest, price of farm products, cost of farm materials and supplies,
labor, or any economic factor which would affect net farm income;
(3) (a) "Broadcast" means the transmission of audio, video, or other signals,
through any electronic, radio, light, or similar medium or method now in
existence or later devised over the airwaves to the public in general.
(b) "Broadcast" shall not apply to operations performed by multichannel video
programming service providers as defined in KRS 136.602 or any other
operations that transmit audio, video, or other signals, exclusively to
persons for a fee;
(4) "Compensating tax rate" means that rate which, rounded to the next higher one-
tenth of one cent ($0.001) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed value and
applied to the current year's assessment of the property subject to taxation by a
taxing district, excluding new property and personal property, produces an
amount of revenue approximately equal to that produced in the preceding year
from real property. However, in no event shall the compensating tax rate be a rate
which, when applied to the total current year assessment of all classes of taxable
property, produces an amount of revenue less than was produced in the preceding
year from all classes of taxable property. For purposes of this subsection,
"property subject to taxation" means the total fair cash value of all property
subject to full local rates, less the total valuation exempted from taxation by the
homestead exemption provision of the Constitution of Kentucky and the
difference between the fair cash value and agricultural or horticultural value of
agricultural or horticultural land;
(5) "County" means any county, consolidated local government, urban-county
government, unified local government, or charter county government;
(6) "County judge/executive" means the chief executive officer of any county,
Page 2 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
consolidated local government, urban-county government, unified local
government, or charter county government;
(7) "Department" means the Department of Revenue;
(8) "Fiscal court" means the legislative body of any county, consolidated local
government, urban-county government, unified local government, or charter
county government;
(9) "Government restriction on use" means a limitation on the use of at least fifty
percent (50%) of the individual dwelling units of a multi-unit rental housing in
order to receive a federal or state government incentive based on low-income
renter restrictions, including the following government incentives:
(a) A tax credit under Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(b) Financing derived from exempt facility bonds for qualified residential
rental projects under Section 142 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(c) A low-interest loan under Section 235 or 236 of the National Housing Act
or Section 515 of the Housing Act of 1949;
(d) A rent subsidy;
(e) A guaranteed loan;
(f) A grant; or
(g) A guarantee;
(10) "Hazardous substances" has the same meaning as in KRS 224.1-400;
(11) "Heavy equipment rental agreement" means the short-term rental contract under
which qualified heavy equipment is rented without an operator for a period:
(a) Not to exceed three hundred sixty-five (365) days; or
(b) That is open-ended under the terms of the contract with no specified end
date;
(12) "Heavy equipment rental company" means an entity that is primarily engaged in
a line of business described in Code 532412 or 532310 of the North American
Page 3 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
Industry Classification System Manual in effect on January 1, 2019;
(13) "Homestead" means real property maintained as the permanent residence of the
owner with all land and improvements adjoining and contiguous thereto
including but not limited to lawns, drives, flower or vegetable gardens,
outbuildings, and all other land connected thereto;
(14) "Horticultural land" means any tract of land, including all income-producing
improvements, of at least five (5) contiguous acres in area commercially used for
the cultivation of a garden, orchard, or the raising of fruits or nuts, vegetables,
flowers, or ornamental plants;
(15) "Intangible personal property" means stocks, mutual funds, money market
funds, bonds, loans, notes, mortgages, accounts receivable, land contracts, cash,
credits, patents, trademarks, copyrights, tobacco base, allotments, annuities,
deferred compensation, retirement plans, and any other type of personal property
that is not tangible personal property;
(16) "Livestock" means cattle, sheep, swine, goats, horses, alpacas, llamas, buffaloes,
and any other animals of the bovine, ovine, porcine, caprine, equine, or camelid
species;
(17) "Low income" means earning at or below eighty percent (80%) of the area
median income as defined by the United States Department of Housing and
Urban Development for the location of the multi-unit rental housing;
(18) "Manufactured home" means a structure manufactured after June 15, 1976, in
accordance with the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety
Standards Act, transportable in one (1) or more sections, which when erected on
site measures eight (8) body feet or more in width and thirty-two (32) body feet or
more in length, and which is built on a permanent chassis and designed to be
used as a dwelling, with or without a permanent foundation, when connected to
the required utilities, and includes the plumbing, heating, air-conditioning, and
Page 4 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
electrical systems contained therein. It may be used as a place of residence,
business, profession, or trade by the owner, lessee, or their assignees and may
consist of one (1) or more units that can be attached or joined together to
comprise an integral unit or condominium structure;
(19) "Mobile home" means a structure manufactured on or before June 15, 1976,
that was not required to be constructed in accordance with the National
Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act, transportable in
one (1) or more sections, which when erected on site measures eight (8) body feet
or more in width and thirty-two (32) body feet or more in length, and which is
built on a permanent chassis and designed to be used as a dwelling, with or
without a permanent foundation, when connected to the required utilities, and
includes the plumbing, heating, air-conditioning, and electrical systems
contained therein. It may be used as a place of residence, business, profession, or
trade by the owner, lessee, or their assigns and may consist of one (1) or more
units that can be attached or joined together to comprise an integral unit or
condominium structure;
(20) "Modular home" means a structure which is certified by its manufacturer as
being constructed in accordance with all applicable provisions of the Kentucky
Building Code and standards adopted by the local authority which has
jurisdiction, transportable in one (1) or more sections, and designed to be used as
a dwelling on a permanent foundation when connected to the required utilities,
and includes the plumbing, heating, air-conditioning, and electrical systems
contained therein;
(21) "Multi-unit rental housing" means residential property or project consisting of
four (4) or more individual dwelling units and does not include:
(a) Assisted living facilities; or
(b) Duplexes or single-family units unless they are included as part of a larger
Page 5 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
property that is subject to government restriction on use;
(22) "Net assessment growth" means the difference between:
(a) The total valuation of property subject to taxation by the county, city, school
district, or special district in the preceding year, less the total valuation
exempted from taxation by the homestead exemption provision of the
Constitution of Kentucky in the current year over that exempted in the
preceding year; and
(b) The total valuation of property subject to taxation by the county, city, school
district, or special district for the current year;
(23) "New property" means the net difference in taxable value between real property
additions and real property deletions to the property tax roll for the current year;
(24) "Personal property" means every species and character of property, tangible and
intangible, other than real property;
(25) "Prefabricated home" means a manufactured home, a mobile home, or a
modular home;
(26) "Pollutant or contaminant" has the same meaning as in KRS 224.1-400;
(27) "Qualified heavy equipment" means machinery and equipment, including
ancillary equipment and any attachments used in conjunction with the machinery
and equipment, that is:
(a) Primarily used and designed for construction, mining, forestry, or industrial
purposes, including but not limited to cranes, earthmoving equipment, well-
drilling machinery and equipment, lifts, material handling equipment,
pumps, generators, and pollution-reducing equipment; and
(b) Held in a heavy equipment rental company's inventory for:
1. Rental under a heavy equipment rental agreement; or
2. Sale in the regular course of business;
(28) "Qualifying voluntary environmental remediation property" means real property
Page 6 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
subject to the provisions of KRS 224.1-400 and 224.1-405, or 224.60-135 where
the Energy and Environment Cabinet has made a determination that:
(a) All releases of hazardous substances, pollutants, contaminants, petroleum,
or petroleum products at the property occurred prior to the property owner's
acquisition of the property;
(b) The property owner has made all appropriate inquiry into previous
ownership and uses of the property in accordance with generally accepted
practices prior to the acquisition of the property;
(c) The property owner or a responsible party has provided all legally required
notices with respect to hazardous substances, pollutants, contaminants,
petroleum, or petroleum products found at the property;
(d) The property owner is in compliance with all land use restrictions and does
not impede the effectiveness or integrity of any institutional control;
(e) The property owner complied with any information request or
administrative subpoena under KRS Chapter 224; and
(f) The property owner is not affiliated with any person who is potentially liable
for the release of hazardous substances, pollutants, contaminants,
petroleum, or petroleum products on the property pursuant to KRS 224.1-
400, 224.1-405, or 224.60-135, through:
1. Direct or indirect familial relationship;
2. Any contractual, corporate, or financial relationship, excluding
relationships created by instruments conveying or financing title or by
contracts for sale of goods or services; or
3. Reorganization of a business entity that was potentially liable;
(29) "Real property":
(a) Means all lands within this state and improvements thereon; and
(b) For property assessed on January 1, 2024, and on January 1, 2025,
Page 7 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
includes but is not limited to mains, pipes, pipelines, and conduits that are:
1. Authorized to be installed in, upon, or under any public or private
street or place; and
2. Used or to be used for or in connection with the collection,
transmission, distribution, conducting, sale, or furnishing of heat,
steam, water, sewage, natural or manufactured gas, or electricity to or
for the public;
(30) "Real property additions" means:
(a) Property annexed or incorporated by a municipal corporation, or any other
taxing jurisdiction; however, this definition shall not apply to property
acquired through the merger or consolidation of school districts, or the
transfer of property from one (1) school district to another;
(b) Property, the ownership of which has been transferred from a tax-exempt
entity to a nontax-exempt entity;
(c) The value of improvements to existing nonresidential property;
(d) The value of new residential improvements to property;
(e) The value of improvements to existing residential property when the
improvement increases the assessed value of the property by fifty percent
(50%) or more;
(f) Property created by the subdivision of unimproved property, provided, that
when the property is reclassified from farm to subdivision by the property
valuation administrator, the value of the property as a farm shall be a
deletion from that category;
(g) Property exempt from taxation, as an inducement for industrial or business
use, at the expiration of its tax exempt status;
(h) Property, the tax rate of which will change, according to the provisions of
KRS 82.085, to reflect additional urban services to be provided by the taxing
Page 8 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
jurisdiction, provided, however, that the property shall be considered real
property additions only in proportion to the additional urban services to be
provided to the property over the urban services previously provided; and
(i) The value of improvements to real property previously under assessment
moratorium;
(31) "Real property deletions" means the value of real property removed from, or
reduced over the preceding year on, the property tax roll for the current year;
(32) "Recreational vehicle" means a vehicular type unit primarily designed as
temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use, which either
has its own motive power or is mounted on or drawn by another vehicle. The
basic entities are camping trailer, motor home, travel trailer, and truck camper.
As used in this subsection:
(a) "Camping trailer" means a vehicular portable unit mounted on wheels and
constructed with collapsible partial side walls which fold for towing by
another vehicle and unfold at the camp site to provide temporary living
quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use;
(b) "Motor home" means a vehicular unit designed to provide temporary living
quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use built on or permanently
attached to a self-propelled motor vehicle chassis or on a chassis cab or van
which is an integral part of the completed vehicle;
(c) "Travel trailer" means a vehicular unit, mounted on wheels, designed to
provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use,
and of a size or weight that does not require special highway movement
permits when drawn by a motorized vehicle, and with a living area of less
than two hundred twenty (220) square feet, excluding built-in equipment
such as wardrobes, closets, cabinets, kitchen units or fixtures, and bath and
toilet rooms; and
Page 9 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
(d) "Truck camper" means a portable unit constructed to provide temporary
living quarters for recreational, travel, or camping use, consisting of a roof,
floor, and sides, designed to be loaded onto and unloaded from the bed of a
pick-up truck;
(33) "Release" has the same meaning as in either or both KRS 224.1-400 and 224.60-
115;
(34) "Resident" means any person who has taken up a place of abode within this state
with the intention of continuing to abide in this state; any person who has had his
or her actual or habitual place of abode in this state for the larger portion of the
twelve (12) months next preceding the date as of which an assessment is due to be
made shall be deemed to have intended to become a resident of this state;
(35) "Residential unit" means all or that part of real property occupied as the
permanent residence of the owner;
(36) "Special benefits" means those benefits that are provided by public works not
financed through the general tax levy but through special assessments against the
benefited property;
(37) "Special purpose governmental entity" has the same meaning as in KRS
65A.010, and as used in this chapter includes only those special purpose
governmental entities with the authority to levy ad valorem taxes and that are not
specifically exempt from the provisions of this chapter by another provision of the
Kentucky Revised Statutes;
(38) "Taxing district" means any entity with the authority to levy a local ad valorem
tax, including special purpose governmental entities;
(39) "Taxpayer" means any person made liable by law to file a return or pay a tax;
and
(40) "Veteran service organization" means an organization wholly dedicated to
advocating on behalf of military veterans and providing charitable programs in
Page 10 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
honor and on behalf of military veterans.
Section 2. KRS 132.017 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Local governmental entity" includes a county fiscal court and legislative
body of a city, urban-county government, consolidated local government,
charter county government, unified local government, or other taxing district;
and
(b) "Next regular election" means the regular election that occurs immediately
after all statutory requirements for levying a property tax rate have been met,
regardless of whether the election occurs in the same or a subsequent calendar
year as the levy of the property tax rate.
(2) (a) 1. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, the portion of a
tax rate levied by an ordinance, order, resolution, or motion of a local
governmental entity or district board of education subject to recall as
provided for in KRS 68.245, 132.023, 132.027, and 160.470, shall go
into effect forty-five (45) days after its passage.
2. When a tax rate is levied by a district board of education or other taxing
district that is primarily located in a county containing an urban-county
government or a consolidated local government, the portion of a tax rate
levied by an ordinance, order, resolution, or motion of a district board of
education or other taxing district subject to recall as provided for in KRS
68.245, 132.023, 132.027, and 160.470, shall go into effect fifty (50)
days after its passage.
(b) During the same forty-five (45) day or fifty (50) day time period provided by
paragraph (a) of this subsection, any three (3) qualified voters, who reside in
the area where the tax levy will be imposed, may commence petition
proceedings to protest the passage of the ordinance, order, resolution, or
Page 11 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
motion by filing an affidavit with the county clerk. The affidavit shall state:
1. The three (3) qualified voters constitute the members of the petition
committee;
2. The petition committee will be responsible for circulating the petition;
3. The petition committee will file the petition in the proper form within
the same forty-five (45) day or fifty (50) day time period provided by
paragraph (a) of this subsection;
4. The names and addresses of the petition committee members;
5. The address to which all notices to the committee are to be sent; and
6. For petition committees filing petitions in response to a tax rate levied
by a district board of education or other taxing district that is primarily
located in a county containing an urban-county government or a
consolidated local government, whether or not the petition committee is
willing to incur all of the expenses associated with electronic petition
signatures. If the petition committee is not willing to incur all of the
expenses, then electronic petition signatures shall not be allowed for the
petition.
(c) Upon receipt of the affidavit, the county clerk shall immediately:
1. Notify the petition committee of all statutory requirements for the filing
of a valid petition under this section;
2. Notify the petition committee that the clerk will publish a notice
identifying the tax levy being challenged and providing the names and
addresses of the petition committee in a newspaper of general
circulation within the county, if:
a. There is a newspaper within the county in which to publish the
notice; and
b. The petition committee remits an amount equal to the cost of
Page 12 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
publishing the notice determined in accordance with the provisions
of KRS 424.160 at the time of the filing of the affidavit.
If the petition committee elects to have the notice published, the clerk
shall publish the notice within five (5) days of receipt of the affidavit;
and
3. Deliver a copy of the affidavit to the appropriate local governmental
entity or district board of education.
(d) The petition shall meet the following requirements:
1. All papers of the petition shall be substantially uniform in size and style
and shall be assembled in one (1) instrument for filing;
2. Each sheet of the petition may contain the names of voters from more
than one (1) voting precinct;
3. Each nonelectronic petition signature shall be executed in ink or
indelible pencil;
4. Each electronic petition signature shall comply with the requirements of
the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act, KRS 369.101 to 369.120;
5. Each petition signature shall be followed by the printed name, street
address, birth month, and birth year of the person signing; and
6. a. i. Except for petitions filed in response to a tax rate levied by a
district board of education, the petition shall be signed by a
number of registered and qualified voters residing in the
affected jurisdiction equal to at least ten percent (10%) of the
total number of votes cast in the last preceding presidential
election.
ii. For petitions filed in response to a tax rate levied by a district
board of education, the petition shall be signed by at least
five thousand (5,000) registered and qualified voters residing
Page 13 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
in the affected jurisdiction or signed by a number of
registered and qualified voters residing in the affected
jurisdiction equal to at least ten percent (10%) of the total
number of votes cast in the last preceding presidential
election, whichever is less.
b. Electronic petition signatures shall be included in determining
whether the required number of petition signatures has been
obtained when:
i. The expenses associated with the electronic petition
signatures have been incurred in accordance with paragraph
(b)6. of this subsection;
ii. The electronic petition signatures comply with the
requirements of this subsection; and
iii. The petition was filed in response to a tax rate levied by a
district board of education or other taxing district that is
primarily located in a county containing an urban-county
government or a consolidated local government.
c. The inclusion of an invalid petition signature on a page shall not
invalidate the entire page of the petition, but shall instead result in
the invalid petition signature being stricken and not counted.
(e) Upon the filing of the petition with the county clerk, the ordinance, order,
resolution, or motion shall be suspended from going into effect until after the
election referred to in subsection (3) of this section is held, or until the
petition is finally determined to be insufficient and no further action may be
taken pursuant to paragraph (i) of this subsection.
(f) The county clerk shall immediately notify the presiding officer of the
appropriate local governmental entity or district board of education that the
Page 14 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
petition has been received and shall, within thirty (30) days of the receipt of
the petition, make a determination of whether the petition contains enough
signatures of qualified voters to place the ordinance, order, resolution, or
motion before the voters.
(g) If the county clerk finds the petition to be sufficient, the clerk shall certify to
the petition committee and the local governmental entity or district board of
education within the thirty (30) day period provided for in paragraph (f) of
this subsection that the petition is properly presented and in compliance with
the provisions of this section, and that the ordinance, order, resolution, or
motion levying the tax will be placed before the voters for approval.
(h) If the county clerk finds the petition to be insufficient, the clerk shall, within
the thirty (30) day period provided for in paragraph (f) of this subsection,
notify, in writing, the petition committee and the local governmental entity or
district board of education of the specific deficiencies found. Notification
shall be sent by certified mail and shall be published at least one (1) time in a
newspaper of general circulation within the county containing the local
governmental entity or district board of education levying the tax. If there is
not a newspaper within the county in which to publish the notification, then
the notification shall be posted at the courthouse door.
(i) A final determination of the sufficiency of a petition shall be subject to final
review by the Circuit Court of the county in which the local governmental
entity or district board of education is located, and shall be limited to the
validity of the county clerk's determination. Any petition challenging the
county clerk's final determination shall be filed within ten (10) days of the
issuance of the clerk's final determination.
(j) The local governmental entity or district board of education may cause the
cancellation of the election by reconsidering and amending the ordinance,
Page 15 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
order, resolution, or motion to levy a tax rate which will produce no more
revenue from real property, exclusive of revenue from new property[ as
defined in KRS 132.010], than four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue
produced by the compensating tax rate[ defined in KRS 132.010] from real
property. The action by the local governmental entity or district board of
education shall be valid only if taken within fifteen (15) days following the
date the clerk finds the petition to be sufficient.
(3) (a) If an election is necessary under the provisions of subsection (2) of this
section:
1. The local governmental entity shall cause to be submitted to the voters
of the district at the next regular election, the question as to whether the
property tax rate shall be levied; or
2. The district board of education shall cause to be submitted to the voters
of the district in a called common school election not less than thirty-
five (35) days nor more than forty-five (45) days from the date the
signatures on the petition are validated by the county clerk, or at the next
regular election, at the option of the district board of education, the
question as to whether the property tax rate shall be levied. The cost of a
called common school election shall be borne by the school district
holding the election. Any called common school election shall comply
with the provisions of KRS 118.025.
(b) If an election under paragraph (a) of this subsection is held in conjunction
with a regular election, the question as to whether the property tax rate shall
be levied shall be submitted to the county clerk no later than the second
Tuesday in August preceding the regular election.
(c) In an election held under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the question shall
be framed to ask whether the voter is for the levy of the property tax rate. If a
Page 16 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
majority of the votes cast upon the question oppose its passage, the ordinance,
order, resolution, or motion shall not go into effect. If a majority of the votes
cast upon the question favor its passage, the ordinance, order, resolution, or
motion shall become effective.
(d) If the ordinance, order, resolution, or motion fails to pass pursuant to an
election held under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the property tax rate
which will produce four percent (4%) more revenues from real property,
exclusive of revenue from new property[ as defined in KRS 132.010], than the
amount of revenue produced by the compensating tax rate[ defined in KRS
132.010], shall be levied without further approval by the local governmental
entity or district board of education.
(e) Local, state, and federal tax dollars shall not be used to advocate, in partial
terms, for or against any public question that appears on the ballot in this
subsection. For purposes of this section, "local" means and includes any city,
county, urban-county government, consolidated local government, unified
local government, charter county, or special district.
(4) Notwithstanding any statutory provision to the contrary, if a local governmental
entity or district board of education has not established a final tax rate as of
September 15, due to the recall provisions of this section, KRS 68.245, 132.027, or
160.470, regular tax bills shall be prepared as required in KRS 133.220 for all
districts having a tax rate established by that date; and a second set of bills shall be
prepared and collected in the regular manner, according to the provisions of KRS
Chapter 132, upon establishment of final tax rates by the remaining districts.
(5) If a second billing is necessary, the collection period shall be extended to conform
with the second billing date.
(6) All costs associated with the second billing shall be paid by the taxing district or
districts requiring the second billing.
Page 17 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
Section 3. KRS 132.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The owner or person assessed shall pay an annual ad valorem tax for state purposes
at the rate of:
(a) Thirty-one and one-half cents ($0.315) upon each one hundred dollars ($100)
of value of all real property directed to be assessed for taxation;
(b) Twenty-five cents ($0.25) upon each one hundred dollars ($100) of value of
all motor vehicles qualifying for permanent registration as historic motor
vehicles under KRS 186.043;
(c) Fifteen cents ($0.15) upon each one hundred dollars ($100) of value of all:
1. Machinery actually engaged in manufacturing;
2. Commercial radio and television equipment used to receive, capture,
produce, edit, enhance, modify, process, store, convey, or transmit audio
or video content or electronic signals which are broadcast over the air to
an antenna, including radio and television towers used to transmit or
facilitate the transmission of the signal broadcast and equipment used to
gather or transmit weather information, but excluding telephone and
cellular communication towers; and
3. Tangible personal property which has been certified as a pollution
control facility as defined in KRS 224.1-300. In the case of tangible
personal property certified as a pollution control facility which is
incorporated into a landfill facility, the tangible personal property shall
be presumed to remain tangible personal property for purposes of this
paragraph if the tangible personal property is being used for its intended
purposes;
(d) Ten cents ($0.10) upon each one hundred dollars ($100) of value on the
operating property of railroads or railway companies that operate solely
within the Commonwealth;
Page 18 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
(e) Five cents ($0.05) upon each one hundred dollars ($100) of value of goods
held for sale in the regular course of business, which includes:
1. Machinery and equipment held in a retailer's inventory for sale or lease
originating under a floor plan financing arrangement;
2. Motor vehicles:
a. Held for sale in the inventory of a licensed motor vehicle dealer,
including licensed motor vehicle auction dealers, which are not
currently titled and registered in Kentucky and are held on an
assignment pursuant to KRS 186A.230; or
b. That are in the possession of a licensed motor vehicle dealer,
including licensed motor vehicle auction dealers, for sale, although
ownership has not been transferred to the dealer;
3. Raw materials, which includes distilled spirits and distilled spirits
inventory;
4. In-process materials, which includes distilled spirits and distilled spirits
inventory, held for incorporation in finished goods held for sale in the
regular course of business; and
5. Qualified heavy equipment;
(f) One and one-half cents ($0.015) upon each one hundred dollars ($100) of
value of all:
1. Privately owned leasehold interests in industrial buildings, as defined
under KRS 103.200, owned and financed by a tax-exempt governmental
unit, or tax-exempt statutory authority under the provisions of KRS
Chapter 103, upon the prior approval of the Kentucky Economic
Development Finance Authority, except that the rate shall not apply to
the proportion of value of the leasehold interest created through any
private financing;
Page 19 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
2. Qualifying voluntary environmental remediation property, provided the
property owner has corrected the effect of all known releases of
hazardous substances, pollutants, contaminants, petroleum, or petroleum
products located on the property consistent with a corrective action plan
approved by the Energy and Environment Cabinet pursuant to KRS
224.1-400, 224.1-405, or 224.60-135, and provided the cleanup was not
financed through a public grant or the petroleum storage tank
environmental assurance fund. This rate shall apply for a period of three
(3) years following the Energy and Environment Cabinet's issuance of a
No Further Action Letter or its equivalent, after which the regular tax
rate shall apply;
3. Tobacco directed to be assessed for taxation;
4. Unmanufactured agricultural products;
5. Aircraft not used in the business of transporting persons or property for
compensation or hire;
6. Federally documented vessels not used in the business of transporting
persons or property for compensation or hire, or for other commercial
purposes; and
7. Privately owned leasehold interests in residential property described in
KRS 132.195(2)(g); and
(g) Forty-five cents ($0.45) upon each one hundred dollars ($100) of value of all
other property directed to be assessed for taxation shall be paid by the owner
or person assessed, except as provided in KRS 132.030, 132.200, 136.300,
and 136.320, providing a different tax rate for particular property.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1)(a) of this section, the state tax rate on real property
shall be reduced to compensate for any increase in the aggregate assessed value of
real property to the extent that the increase exceeds the preceding year's assessment
Page 20 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
by more than four percent (4%), excluding:
(a) The assessment of new property[ as defined in KRS 132.010(8)];
(b) The assessment from property which is subject to tax increment financing
pursuant to KRS Chapter 65; and
(c) The assessment from leasehold property which is owned and financed by a
tax-exempt governmental unit, or tax-exempt statutory authority under the
provisions of KRS Chapter 103 and entitled to the reduced rate of one and
one-half cents ($0.015) pursuant to subsection (1)(f) of this section. In any
year in which the aggregate assessed value of real property is less than the
preceding year, the state rate shall be increased to the extent necessary to
produce the approximate amount of revenue that was produced in the
preceding year from real property.
(3) By July 1 each year, the department shall compute the state tax rate applicable to
real property for the current year in accordance with the provisions of subsection
(2) of this section and certify the rate to the county clerks for their use in preparing
the tax bills. If the assessments for all counties have not been certified by July 1, the
department shall, when either real property assessments of at least seventy-five
percent (75%) of the total number of counties of the Commonwealth have been
determined to be acceptable by the department, or when the number of counties
having at least seventy-five percent (75%) of the total real property assessment for
the previous year have been determined to be acceptable by the department, make
an estimate of the real property assessments of the uncertified counties and compute
the state tax rate.
(4) If the tax rate set by the department as provided in subsection (2) of this section
produces more than a four percent (4%) increase in real property tax revenues,
excluding:
(a) The revenue resulting from new property[ as defined in KRS 132.010(8)];
Page 21 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
(b) The revenue from property which is subject to tax increment financing
pursuant to KRS Chapter 65; and
(c) The revenue from leasehold property which is owned and financed by a tax-
exempt governmental unit, or tax-exempt statutory authority under the
provisions of KRS Chapter 103 and entitled to the reduced rate of one and
one-half cents ($0.015) pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;
the rate shall be adjusted in the succeeding year so that the cumulative total of each
year's property tax revenue increase shall not exceed four percent (4%) per year.
(5) The provisions of subsection (2) of this section notwithstanding, the assessed value
of unmined coal certified by the department after July 1, 1994, shall not be included
with the assessed value of other real property in determining the state real property
tax rate. All omitted unmined coal assessments made after July 1, 1994, shall also
be excluded from the provisions of subsection (2) of this section. The calculated
rate shall, however, be applied to unmined coal property, and the state revenue shall
be devoted to the program described in KRS 146.550 to 146.570, except that four
hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) of the state revenue shall be paid annually to
the State Treasury and credited to the Office of Energy Policy for the purpose of
public education of coal-related issues.
Section 4. KRS 132.0225 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) A taxing district that does not elect to attempt to set a rate that will produce
more than four percent (4%) in additional revenue, exclusive of revenue from
new property[ as defined in KRS 132.010], over the amount of revenue
produced by the compensating tax rate[ as defined in KRS 132.010] shall
establish a final tax rate within forty-five (45) days of the department's
certification of the county's property tax roll.
(b) For boards of education, the forty-five (45) days shall begin from the date of
the department's certification to the chief state school officer as required by
Page 22 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
KRS 160.470(4).
(c) A city that does not elect to have city ad valorem taxes collected by the sheriff
as provided in KRS 91A.070(1) shall be exempt from the forty-five (45) day
deadline.
(d) Any nonexempt taxing district that fails to meet the forty-five (45) day
deadline shall be required to use the compensating tax rate for that year's
property tax bills.
(2) A taxing district that elects to attempt to set a rate that will produce more than four
percent (4%) in additional revenue, exclusive of revenue from new property[ as
defined in KRS 132.010], over the amount of revenue produced by the
compensating tax rate[ as defined in KRS 132.010] shall follow the provisions of
KRS 132.017.
Section 5. KRS 132.027 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No city or urban-county government shall levy a tax rate which exceeds the
compensating tax rate[ defined in KRS 132.010] until the city or urban-county
government has complied with the provisions of subsection (2) of this section.
(2) (a) Cities or urban-county governments proposing to levy a tax rate which
exceeds the compensating tax rate[ defined in KRS 132.010] shall hold a
public hearing to hear comments from the public regarding the proposed tax
rate. The hearing shall be held in the principal office of the taxing district, or,
in the event the taxing district has no office, or the office is not suitable for a
hearing, the hearing shall be held in a suitable facility as near as possible to
the geographic center of the district.
(b) The city or urban-county government shall advertise the hearing by causing to
be published at least twice in two (2) consecutive weeks, in the newspaper of
largest circulation in the county, a display type advertisement of not less than
twelve (12) column inches, the following:
Page 23 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
1. The tax rate levied in the preceding year, and the revenue produced by
that rate;
2. The tax rate proposed for the current year and the revenue expected to
be produced by that rate;
3. The compensating tax rate and the revenue expected from it;
4. The revenue expected from new property and personal property;
5. The general areas to which revenue in excess of the revenue produced in
the preceding year is to be allocated;
6. A time and place for the public hearing which shall be held not less than
seven (7) days nor more than ten (10) days after the day the second
advertisement is published;
7. The purpose of the hearing; and
8. A statement to the effect that the General Assembly has required
publication of the advertisement and the information contained therein.
(c) In lieu of the two (2) published notices, a single notice containing the required
information may be sent by first-class mail to each person owning real
property in the taxing district, addressed to the property owner at his residence
or principal place of business as shown on the current year property tax roll.
(d) The hearing shall be open to the public. All persons desiring to be heard shall
be given an opportunity to present oral testimony. The taxing district may set
reasonable time limits for testimony.
(3) (a) That portion of a tax rate levied by an action of a city or urban-county
government which will produce revenue from real property, exclusive of
revenue from new property, more than four percent (4%) over the amount of
revenue produced by the compensating tax rate[ defined in KRS 132.010]
shall be subject to a recall vote or reconsideration by the taxing district, as
provided for in KRS 132.017, and shall be advertised as provided for in
Page 24 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) The city or urban-county government shall, within seven (7) days following
adoption of an ordinance to levy a tax rate which will produce revenue from
real property, exclusive of revenue from new property[ as defined in KRS
132.010], more than four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue produced
by the compensating tax rate[ defined in KRS 132.010], cause to be
published, in the newspaper of largest circulation in the county, a display type
advertisement of not less than twelve (12) column inches the following:
1. The fact that the city or urban-county government has adopted a rate;
2. The fact that the part of the rate which will produce revenue from real
property, exclusive of new property[ as defined in KRS 132.010], in
excess of four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue produced by the
compensating tax rate[ defined in KRS 132.010] is subject to recall, and
3. The name, address, and telephone number of the county clerk of the
county or urban-county in which the taxing district is located, with a
notation to the effect that that official can provide the necessary
information about the petition required to initiate recall of the tax rate.
Section 6. KRS 132.825 is amended to read as follows:
(1) It shall be the duty of all persons providing communications services or
multichannel video programming services defined under KRS 136.602 owning or
having any interest in tangible personal property in this state to list or have listed
the property with the department between January 1 and May 15 in each year
reporting the full details, a correct description of the property and its value.
(2) The department shall have sole power to value and assess all tangible personal
property of multichannel video programming service providers and
communications service providers. Such property shall be valued and assessed in
accordance with procedures established for locally assessed tangible property. The
Page 25 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
department shall develop forms for reporting.
(3) Providers of multichannel video programming services or communications services
shall not be required to list, and the department shall not assess intangible property[
as defined in KRS 132.010].
(4) It is the intent of KRS 136.600 to 136.660 to relieve communications service
providers and multichannel video programming service providers from the tax
liability imposed under KRS 136.120 by:
(a) Requiring real, tangible, and intangible property owned by communications
service providers and multichannel video programming service providers to
be assessed and taxed in the same manner as real, tangible, and intangible
property of all other taxpayers under KRS Chapter 132 excluding KRS
132.030; and
(b) Replacing revenues received from communications service providers and
multichannel video programming service providers under KRS 136.120,
attributable to the franchise portion of operating property as defined in KRS
136.115, with the levy imposed under KRS 136.616.
To the extent that any tangible or intangible property was considered a part of the
franchise portion of operating property under KRS 136.115 and 136.120 for tax
periods ending prior to January 1, 2006, for a communications service provider or a
multichannel video programming service provider, such property shall be exempt
from taxation under KRS Chapter 132 and shall not be listed, valued or assessed
under this section for tax periods beginning on or after December 31, 2005.
(5) It is also the intent of KRS 136.600 to 136.660 that for communications service
providers and multichannel video programming service providers the following
items, to the extent these items are intangible property, shall be exempt from
taxation under KRS Chapter 132 and shall not be listed, valued, or assessed by the
department or local jurisdictions. The items include but shall not be limited to:
Page 26 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
(a) Franchises;
(b) Certificates of public convenience and necessity;
(c) Licenses;
(d) Authorizations issued by the Federal Communications Commission or any
state public service commission;
(e) Customer lists;
(f) Assembled labor force;
(g) Goodwill;
(h) Managerial skills;
(i) Business enterprise value;
(j) Speculative value; and
(k) Any other type of personal property that is not tangible personal property.
(6) Any person dissatisfied with or aggrieved by the finding or ruling of the department
may appeal the finding or ruling in the manners provided in KRS 131.110.
(7) All persons in whose name property is assessed shall remain bound for the tax,
notwithstanding that they may have sold or parted with it.
(8) The department shall allocate the assessed value of property described in subsection
(1) of this section among the counties, cities, and taxing districts. The assessed
value shall be allocated to the county, city, or taxing district where the property is
situated.
(9) The department shall certify, unless otherwise specified, to the county clerk of each
county in which any of the property assessment listed by the corporation is liable to
local taxation, the amount of tangible personal property liable for county, city, or
district tax.
(10) No appeal shall delay the collection or payment of taxes based upon the assessment
in controversy. The taxpayer shall pay all state, county, and district taxes due on the
valuation that the taxpayer claims as the true value as stated in the protest filed
Page 27 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
under KRS 131.110. When the valuation is finally determined upon appeal, the
taxpayer shall be billed for any additional tax and interest at the tax interest rate as
defined in KRS 131.010(6), from the date the tax would have become due if no
appeal had been taken. The provisions of KRS 134.015(6) shall apply to the tax bill.
(11) The certification of valuation shall be filed by each county clerk in the clerk's office
and shall be certified by the county clerk to the proper collecting officer of the
county, city, or taxing district for collection. Any district that has the value certified
by the department shall pay an annual fee to the department that represents an
allocation of the department's operating and overhead expenses incurred in
generating the valuations. This fee shall be determined by the department and shall
apply to valuations for tax periods beginning on or after January 1, 2005.
Section 7. KRS 140.300 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 140.310 to 140.360, these words shall have the following meaning:
(1) "Agricultural land" has the same meaning as[means that real estate which is
defined] in KRS 132.010[(9)].
(2) "Horticultural land" has the same meaning as[means that real estate which is
defined] in KRS 132.010[(10)].
(3) "Agricultural or horticultural value" has the same meaning as[means the value as
defined] in KRS 132.010[(11)].
(4) "Qualified real estate" means real property which:
(a) Is either horticultural or agricultural land;
(b) Has been used for agricultural or horticultural purposes for five (5) years prior
to the death of the owner of the real estate or a joint owner thereof; and
(c) Fair cash value exceeds fifty percent (50%) of the gross taxable estate of
decedent for Kentucky inheritance tax purposes.
(5) "Qualified person" means the spouse of a deceased owner of agricultural or
horticultural land; the children, adopted children, and stepchildren of that deceased
Page 28 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
owner; the spouses and issue of that deceased owner's children, adopted children,
and stepchildren, and is a person who proposes to devote the real property to
agricultural or horticultural purposes for at least five (5) years after the death of the
decedent in whose estate the agricultural or horticultural land is subject to
assessment.
Section 8. KRS 217.015 is amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of KRS 217.005 to 217.215:
(1) "Advertisement" means all representations, disseminated in any manner or by any
means, other than by labeling, for the purpose of inducing, or which are likely to
induce, directly or indirectly, the purchase of food, drugs, devices, or cosmetics;
(2) "Bread" and "enriched bread" mean only the foods commonly known and described
as white bread, white rolls, white buns, enriched white bread, enriched rolls, and
enriched white buns, as defined under the federal act. For the purposes of KRS
217.136 and 217.137, "bread" or "enriched bread" also means breads that may
include vegetables or fruit as an ingredient;
(3) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or its designee;
(4) "Color" means but is not limited to black, white, and intermediate grays;
(5) "Color additive" means a material that:
(a) Is a dye, pigment, or other substance made by a process of synthesis or similar
artifice, or extracted, isolated, or otherwise derived, with or without
intermediate or final change of identity, from a vegetable, animal, mineral, or
other source. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to apply to any
pesticide chemical, soil or plant nutrient, or other agricultural chemical solely
because of its effect in aiding, retarding, or otherwise affecting, directly or
indirectly, the growth or other natural physiological process of produce of the
soil and thereby affecting its color, whether before or after harvest; or
(b) When added or applied to a food, drug, or cosmetic, or to the human body or
Page 29 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
any part thereof, is capable, alone or through reaction with another substance,
of imparting color. "Color additive" does not include any material that has
been or may in the future be exempted under the federal act;
(6) "Contaminated with filth" means any food, drug, device, or cosmetic that is not
securely protected from dust, dirt, and as far as may be necessary by all reasonable
means, from all foreign or injurious contaminants;
(7) "Cosmetic" means:
(a) Articles intended to be rubbed, poured, sprinkled, sprayed on, introduced into,
or otherwise applied to the human body or any part thereof for cleansing,
beautifying, promoting attractiveness, or altering the appearance; and
(b) Articles intended for use as a component of those articles, except that the term
shall not include soap;
(8) "Device," except when used in subsection (48) of this section, KRS 217.035(6),
KRS 217.065(3), KRS 217.095(3), and KRS 217.175(10), means instruments,
apparatus, and contrivances, including their components, parts, and accessories,
intended:
(a) For use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease
in man or other animals; or
(b) To affect the structure or any function of the body of man or other animals;
(9) "Dispense" means to deliver a drug or device to an ultimate user or research subject
by or pursuant to the lawful order of a practitioner, including the packaging,
labeling, or compounding necessary to prepare the substance for that delivery;
(10) "Dispenser" means a person who lawfully dispenses a drug or device to or for the
use of an ultimate user;
(11) "Drug" means:
(a) Articles recognized in the official United States pharmacopoeia, official
homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official national
Page 30 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
formulary, or any supplement to any of them;
(b) Articles intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment or
prevention of disease in man or other animals;
(c) Articles, other than food, intended to affect the structure or any function of the
body of man or other animals; and
(d) Articles intended for use as a component of any article specified in this
subsection but does not include devices or their components, parts, or
accessories;
(12) "Enriched," as applied to flour, means the addition to flour of vitamins and other
nutritional ingredients necessary to make it conform to the definition and standard
of enriched flour as defined under the federal act;
(13) "Environmental Pesticide Control Act of 1972" means the Federal Environmental
Pesticide Control Act of 1972, Pub. L. 92-516, and all amendments thereto;
(14) "Fair Packaging and Labeling Act" means the Fair Packaging and Labeling Act as it
relates to foods and cosmetics, 15 U.S.C. sec.[secs.] 1451 et seq., and all
amendments thereto;
(15) "Federal act" means the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C.
sec.[secs.] 301 et seq., 52 Stat. sec. 1040 et seq., or amendments thereto;
(16) "Filled milk" means any milk, cream, or skimmed milk, whether or not condensed,
evaporated, concentrated, frozen, powdered, dried, or desiccated, to which has been
added, or which has been blended or compounded with, any fat or oil other than
milk fat, except the fat or oil of contained eggs and nuts and the fat or oil of
substances used for flavoring purposes only, so that the resulting product is an
imitation or semblance of milk, cream, skimmed milk, ice cream mix, ice cream, or
frozen desserts, whether or not condensed, evaporated, concentrated, frozen,
powdered, dried, or desiccated, whether in bulk or in containers, hermetically
sealed or unsealed. This definition does not mean or include any milk or cream
Page 31 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
from which no part of the milk or butter fat has been extracted, whether or not
condensed, evaporated, concentrated, powdered, dried, or desiccated, to which has
been added any substance rich in vitamins, nor any distinctive proprietary food
compound not readily mistaken for milk or cream or for condensed, evaporated,
concentrated, powdered, dried, or desiccated milk or cream, if the compound is
prepared and designed for the feeding of infants or young children, sick or infirm
persons, and customarily used on the order of a physician, and is packed in
individual containers bearing a label in bold type that the contents are to be used for
those purposes; nor shall this definition prevent the use, blending, or compounding
of chocolate as a flavor with milk, cream, or skimmed milk, desiccated, whether in
bulk or in containers, hermetically sealed or unsealed, to or with which has been
added, blended or compounded no other fat or oil other than milk or butter fat;
(17) "Flour" means only the foods commonly known as flour, white flour, wheat flour,
plain flour, bromated flour, self-rising flour, self-rising white flour, self-rising
wheat flour, phosphated flour, phosphated white flour, and phosphated wheat flour,
defined under the federal act;
(18) "Food" means:
(a) Articles used for food or drink for man or other animals;
(b) Chewing gum; and
(c) Articles used for components of any such article;
(19) "Food additive" means any substance the intended use of which results or may be
reasonably expected to result, directly or indirectly, in its becoming a component or
otherwise affecting the characteristics of any food, including any substance
intended for use in producing, manufacturing, packing, processing, preparing,
treating, packaging, transporting, or holding food; and including any source of
radiation intended for any of these uses, if the substance is not generally
recognized, among experts qualified by scientific training and experience to
Page 32 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
evaluate its safety, as having been adequately shown through scientific procedures
or, in the case of a substance used in a food prior to January 1, 1958, through either
scientific procedures or experience based on common use in food to be safe under
the conditions of its intended use; except that the term does not include:
(a) A pesticide chemical in or on a raw agricultural commodity;
(b) A pesticide chemical to the extent that it is intended for use or is used in the
production, storage, or transportation of any raw agricultural commodity;
(c) A color additive; or
(d) Any substance used in accordance with a sanction or approval granted prior to
the enactment of the Food Additives Amendment of 1958, pursuant to the
federal act; the Poultry Products Inspection Act, 21 U.S.C. sec.[secs.] 451 et
seq.; or the Meat Inspection Act of 1907; and amendments thereto;
(20) "Food processing establishment" means any commercial establishment in which
food is manufactured, processed, or packaged for human consumption, but does not
include retail food establishments, home-based processors, or home-based
microprocessors;
(21) "Food service establishment" means any fixed or mobile commercial establishment
that engages in the preparation and serving of ready-to-eat foods in portions to the
consumer, including but not limited to: restaurants; coffee shops; cafeterias; short
order cafes; luncheonettes; grills; tea rooms; sandwich shops; soda fountains;
taverns; bars; cocktail lounges; nightclubs; roadside stands; industrial feeding
establishments; private, public or nonprofit organizations or institutions routinely
serving food; catering kitchens; commissaries; charitable food kitchens; or similar
places in which food is prepared for sale or service on the premises or elsewhere
with or without charge. It does not include food vending machines, establishments
serving beverages only in single service or original containers, or retail food stores
which only cut, slice, and prepare cold-cut sandwiches for individual consumption;
Page 33 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
(22) "Food storage warehouse" means any establishment in which food is stored for
subsequent distribution;
(23) "Immediate container" does not include package liners;
(24) "Imminent health hazard" means a significant threat or danger to health that is
considered to exist when there is evidence sufficient to show that a product,
practice, circumstance, or event creates a situation that requires immediate
correction or cessation of operation to prevent illness or injury based on:
(a) The number of potential illnesses or injuries; or
(b) The nature, severity, and duration of the anticipated illness or injury;
(25) "Interference" means threatening or otherwise preventing the performance of lawful
inspections or duties by agents of the cabinet during all reasonable times of
operation;
(26) "Label" means a display of written, printed, or graphic matter upon the immediate
container of any article; and a requirement made by or under authority of KRS
217.005 to 217.215 that any word, statement, or other information appearing on the
label shall not be considered to be complied with unless the word, statement, or
other information also appears on the outside container or wrapper, if any there be,
of the retail package of the article, or is easily legible through the outside container
or wrapper;
(27) "Labeling" means all labels and other written, printed, or graphic matter:
(a) Upon an article or any of its containers or wrappers; or
(b) Accompanying the article;
(28) "Legend drug" means a drug defined by the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act,
as amended, and under which definition its label is required to bear the statement
"Caution: Federal law prohibits dispensing without prescription.";
(29) "Meat Inspection Act" means the Federal Meat Inspection Act, 21 U.S.C.
sec.[secs.] 71 et seq., 34 Stat. sec. 1260 et seq., including any amendments thereto;
Page 34 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
(30) "New drug" means:
(a) Any drug the composition of which is such that the drug is not generally
recognized among experts qualified by scientific training and experience to
evaluate the safety of drugs as safe for use under the conditions prescribed,
recommended, or suggested in the labeling thereof; or
(b) Any drug the composition of which is such that the drug, as a result of
investigations to determine its safety for use under prescribed conditions, has
become so recognized, but which has not, otherwise than in the investigations,
been used to a material extent or for a material time under the conditions;
(31) "Official compendium" means the official United States pharmacopoeia, official
homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, official national formulary, or
any supplement to any of them;
(32) "Person" means an individual, firm, partnership, company, corporation, trustee,
association, or any public or private entity;
(33) "Pesticide chemical" means any substance that alone in chemical combination, or in
formulation with one or more other substances, is an "economic poison" within the
meaning of the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide and Rodenticide Act and
amendments thereto, and that is used in the production, storage, or transportation of
raw agricultural commodities;
(34) "Poultry Products Inspection Act" means the Federal Poultry and Poultry Products
Inspection Act, 21 U.S.C. sec.[secs.] 451 et seq., Pub. L. 85-172, 71 Stat. sec. 441,
and any amendments thereto;
(35) "Practitioner" means medical or osteopathic physicians, dentists, chiropodists, and
veterinarians who are licensed under the professional licensing laws of Kentucky to
prescribe and administer drugs and devices. "Practitioner" includes optometrists
when administering or prescribing pharmaceutical agents authorized in KRS
320.240(12) to (14), advanced practice registered nurses as authorized in KRS
Page 35 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
314.011 and 314.042, physician assistants when administering or prescribing
pharmaceutical agents as authorized in KRS 311.858, and health care professionals
who are residents of and actively practicing in a state other than Kentucky and who
are licensed and have prescriptive authority under the professional licensing laws of
another state, unless the person's Kentucky license has been revoked, suspended,
restricted, or probated, in which case the terms of the Kentucky license shall
prevail;
(36) "Prescription" means a written or oral order for a drug or medicine, or combination
or mixture of drugs or medicines, or proprietary preparation, that is signed, given,
or authorized by a medical, advanced practice registered nurse, dental, chiropody,
veterinarian, or optometric practitioner, and intended for use in the diagnosis, cure,
mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in man or other animals;
(37) "Prescription blank" means a document that conforms with KRS 217.216 and is
intended for prescribing a drug to an ultimate user;
(38) "Raw agricultural commodity" means any food in its raw or natural state, including
all fruits that are washed, colored, or otherwise treated in their unpeeled natural
form prior to marketing;
(39) "Retail food establishment" means any food service establishment, retail food store,
or a combination of both within the same establishment;
(40) "Retail food store" means any fixed or mobile establishment where food or food
products, including prepackaged, labeled sandwiches or other foods to be heated in
a microwave or infrared oven at the time of purchase, are offered for sale to the
consumer, and intended for off-premises consumption, but does not include
establishments which handle only prepackaged, snack-type, nonpotentially
hazardous foods, markets that offer only fresh fruits and vegetables for sale, food
service establishments, food and beverage vending machines, vending machine
commissaries, food processing establishments, or home-based processors;
Page 36 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
(41) "Salvage distributor" means a person who engages in the business of distributing,
peddling, or otherwise trafficking in any salvaged merchandise;
(42) "Salvage processing plant" means an establishment operated by a person engaged in
the business of reconditioning, labeling, relabeling, repackaging, recoopering,
sorting, cleaning, culling or who by other means salvages, sells, offers for sale, or
distributes for human or animal consumption or use any salvaged food, beverage,
including beer, wine and distilled spirits, vitamins, food supplements, dentifices,
cosmetics, single-service food containers or utensils, containers and packaging
materials used for foods and cosmetics, soda straws, paper napkins, or any other
product of a similar nature that has been damaged or contaminated by fire, water,
smoke, chemicals, transit, or by any other means;
(43) "Second or subsequent offense" has the same meaning as it does in KRS 218A.010;
(44) "Secretary" means the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(45) "Temporary food service establishment" means any food service establishment
which operates at a fixed location for a period of time, not to exceed fourteen (14)
consecutive days;
(46) "Traffic" has the same meaning as[ it does] in KRS 218A.010;
(47) "Ultimate user" has the same meaning as[ it does] in KRS 218A.010;
(48) If an article is alleged to be misbranded because the labeling is misleading, or if an
advertisement is alleged to be false because it is misleading, in determining whether
the labeling or advertisement is misleading, there shall be taken into account,
among other things, not only representations made or suggested by statement, word,
design, device, sound, or in any combination thereof, but also the extent to which
the labeling or advertisement fails to reveal facts that are material in the light of the
representations or material with respect to consequences which may result from the
use of the article to which the labeling or advertisement relates under the conditions
of use prescribed in the labeling or advertisement thereof or under the conditions of
Page 37 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
use as are customary or usual;
(49) The representation of a drug in its labeling or advertisement as an antiseptic shall be
considered to be a representation that it is a germicide, except in the case of a drug
purporting to be, or represented as, an antiseptic for inhibitory use as a wet
dressing, ointment, dusting powder, or other use involving prolonged contact with
the body;
(50) The provisions of KRS 217.005 to 217.215 regarding the selling of food, drugs,
devices, or cosmetics shall be considered to include the manufacture, production,
processing, packing, exposure, offer, possession, and holding of those articles for
sale, the sale, dispensing, and giving of those articles, and the supplying or applying
of those articles in the conduct of any food, drug, or cosmetic establishment;
(51) "Home" means a primary residence occupied by the processor, that contains only
two (2) ranges, ovens, or double-ovens, and no more than three (3) refrigerators
used for cold storage. This equipment shall have been designed for home use and
not for commercial use, and shall be operated in the kitchen within the residence;
(52) "Formulated acid food product" means an acid food in which the addition of a small
amount of low-acid food results in a finished equilibrium pH of 4.6 or below that
does not significantly differ from that of the predominant acid or acid food;
(53) "Acidified food product" means a low-acid food to which acid or acidic food is
added and which has a water activity value greater than 0.85, and a finished
equilibrium pH of 4.6 or below;
(54) "Low-acid food" means foods, other than alcoholic beverages, with a finished
equilibrium pH greater than 4.6, and a water activity value greater than 0.85;
(55) "Acid food" means foods that have a natural pH of 4.6 or below;
(56) "Home-based processor" means a person who in his or her home, produces or
processes non-potentially hazardous foods, including but not limited to dried herbs,
spices, nuts, candy, dried grains, whole fruit and vegetables, mixed-greens, jams,
Page 38 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1212
jellies, sweet sorghum syrup, preserves, fruit butter, bread, fruit pies, cakes, or
cookies, and who has a gross income of no more than sixty thousand dollars
($60,000) annually from the sale of the products;
(57) "Home-based microprocessor" means a farmer who, in the farmer's home or
certified or permitted kitchen, produces or processes foods, including but not
limited to acid foods, formulated acid food products, acidified food products, or
low-acid canned foods, and who has a gross income of no more than sixty thousand
dollars ($60,000) annually from the sale of the product;
(58) "Certified" means any person or home-based microprocessor who:
(a) Has attended the Kentucky Cooperative Extension Service's microprocessing
program or pilot microprocessing program and has been identified by the
Kentucky Cooperative Extension Service as having satisfactorily completed
the prescribed course of instruction; or
(b) Has attended some other school pursuant to 21 C.F.R. sec. 114.10;
(59) "Farmer" means a person who is a resident of Kentucky and owns or rents
agricultural land as defined in[pursuant to subsection (9) of] KRS 132.010 or
horticultural land as defined in[pursuant to subsection (10) of] KRS 132.010. For
the purposes of KRS 217.136 to 217.139, "farmer" also means any person who is a
resident of Kentucky and has grown the primary horticultural and agronomic
ingredients used in the home-based microprocessed products which they have
produced; and
(60) "Farmers market temporary food service establishment" means any temporary food
service establishment operated by a farmer who is a member of the market which
operates within the confines of a farmers market registered with the Kentucky
Department of Agriculture for the direct-to-consumer marketing of Kentucky-
grown farm products from approved sources for a period of time not to exceed two
(2) days per week for any consecutive six (6) months period in a calendar year.
Page 39 of 39
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:59 PM Jacketed